Washington, session 2025-2026, HB2323.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. The legislature finds that traffic stops can be tense situations for the driver and law enforcement officer, and that people who are neurodiverse may react in a manner that could be misunderstood in the context of a traffic stop, inadvertently resulting in an escalation of the situation. The legislature, therefore, intends to establish a voluntary blue envelope program to enhance communication between law enforcement and community members with a disability or condition that may be helpful during traffic stops.NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 2. A new section is added to chapter 46.19 RCW to read as follows:(1) The department, in consultation with relevant stakeholders, shall develop a blue envelope program for operators and passengers of motor vehicles with a disability or condition that could impact the way they interact with law enforcement during a traffic stop. The blue envelope developed as part of the program must contain the following:(a) Printed information for the envelope's holder regarding traffic stop safety tips;(b) Printed recommendations for the responding law enforcement officer with interaction techniques applicable to those who are neurodiverse to help promote enhanced communication and accommodation between law enforcement officers and community members; and(c) Printed information on the envelope explaining that documents related to the qualified individual's vehicle including, but not limited to, vehicle registration documents and proof of insurance, should be enclosed within the envelope.(2) The blue envelope program must allow a qualified individual to obtain, at no cost, a blue envelope from any driver licensing office within the state.(3) The department must maintain on an existing web page or website clear, accessible program information and resources regarding the blue envelope program.(4) For purposes of this section, a person who is "neurodiverse" is an individual with autism, attention deficit hyperactivity disorder, bipolar disorder, developmental prosopagnosia, developmental speech disorders, dyslexia, dysgraphia, dyspraxia, dyscalculia, dysnomia, intellectual disability, obsessiveâcompulsive disorder, schizophrenia, sensory processing disorder, synesthesia, Tourette syndrome, or a related or similar condition.(5) The department is authorized to apply for, receive, and accept grants and donations including services from public and private entities for the purpose and intent of this section.--- END ---